Tennessee, session 114, SB1819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each public high school shall provide students who are enrolled in a United
States government and civics course with three (3) civic engagement field days, one (1)
for each of the three (3) distinct branches of government. A civic engagement field day
required pursuant to this subsection (a) must:
(1) Include structured learning activities aligned with the state board-
adopted academic standards for the United States government and civics
course; and
(2) For purposes of the civic engagement field day that covers the:
(A) Legislative branch, include a class visit to a city council,
county commission, or the general assembly;
(B) Judicial branch, include a class visit to a courthouse to allow
students to observe a judicial proceeding or to meet with a judge or court
official; and
(C) Executive branch, include a class visit to the office of a
mayor, county executive, or to the office of the governor.
(b) If a high school student who is enrolled in the United States government and
civics course is absent from school on the day for which a class visit described in
SB1819
011092
- 1 -

subdivision (a)(2) occurs, then the public high school is not required to reschedule the
class visit or arrange for a separate visit for the absent student.
(c) A public high school may prohibit a student who is enrolled in the United
States government and civics course from attending a class visit described in
subdivision (a)(2) for disciplinary reasons in accordance with the disciplinary policy of the
LEA or public charter school.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 011092